Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1848.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 635.11. Coverage for Physical Therapy, Occupational Therapy and Speech Therapy.--(a) A health insurance policy or government program shall provide coverage for medically necessary physical therapy, occupational therapy and speech 1234567891011121314151617181920212223 therapy for covered individuals under twenty-one (21) years of age. The following shall apply:(1) Coverage provided under this section may not be subject to any deductible, maximum benefit amount or limit on the number of visits.(2) Coverage provided under this section may be subject to copayments or coinsurance requirements imposed by a health insurance policy or government program for similar coverage under the same health insurance policy.(3) This section shall not be construed as limiting benefits which are otherwise available to an individual under a health insurance policy or government program.(4) This section shall not be construed as requiring coverage by an insurer of any service based solely on its inclusion in an individualized education program. Consistent with Federal or State law and upon consent of the parent or guardian of the covered individual, the physical, occupational or speech therapies available under this section may be coordinated with any service included in an individualized education program. Coverage of physical, occupational or speech therapies shall not be contingent upon a coordination of services with an individualized education program.(b) (1) A restricted account is established within the General Fund to be known as the Children's Therapies Medical Assistance Savings Account.(2) Savings realized by the medical assistance program, as determined under subsection (c), shall be deposited into the account.(3) Money in the account is appropriated to the Department of Human Services on a continuing basis to increase access to 20250HB1848PN2284 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 physical therapy, occupational therapy and speech therapy services for individuals in the Early Intervention Program or for individuals under twenty-one (21) years of age covered under a government program.(4) Money in the account shall be used by the department to increase reimbursement rates paid to providers of physical therapy, occupational therapy and speech therapy or to offset increased costs in the Children's Health Insurance Program due to expanded coverage required under subsection (a).(c) (1) The Department of Human Services shall, as necessary, develop a formula for calculating savings realized by the medical assistance program due to a decrease in the capitation rate paid to a managed care organization for physical therapy, occupational therapy and speech therapy services for children under twenty-one (21) years of age. The formula shall use the capitation rate from the calendar year prior to when the rates submitted to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services would take effect and subtract the new capitation rate after the rates submitted to the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services take effect to calculate the savings.(2) The sum under paragraph (1) shall be multiplied by the applicable State-share percentage to calculate the total amount of money to be deposited into the account under subsection (b)(2).(d) As used in this section:(1) "Account" means the Children's Therapies Medical Assistance Savings Account established under subsection (b)(1).(2) "Government program" means any of the following:(i) The medical assistance program established under the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the "Human Services 20250HB1848PN2284 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Code."(ii) The Children's Health Care Program established under Article XXIII-A.(3) "Health insurance policy" means an individual or group insurance policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by an insurer that provides medical or health care coverage, including emergency services. The term does not include:(i) An accident only policy.(ii) A credit only policy.(iii) A long-term care or disability income policy.(iv) A specified disease policy.(v) A Medicare supplement policy.(vi) A TRICARE policy, including a Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement policy.(vii) A fixed indemnity policy.(viii) A hospital indemnity policy.(ix) A dental only policy.(x) A vision only policy.(xi) A workers' compensation policy.(xii) An automobile medical payment policy.(xiii) A homeowners' insurance policy.(xiv) A short-term limited duration policy.(xv) Any other similar policy providing for limited benefits.(4) "Insurer" means an entity licensed by the department with accident and health authority to issue a health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(i) This act, including section 630 and Article XXIV.20250HB1848PN2284 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (ii) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the "Health Maintenance Organization Act."(iii) 40 Pa.C.S. Ch. 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).(5) "Medically necessary" means a service, item, procedure or level of care that:(i) will, or is reasonably expected to, prevent the onset of an illness, condition, injury or disability;(ii) will, or is reasonably expected to, reduce or ameliorate the physical, mental or developmental effects of an illness, condition, injury or disability; or(iii) will assist the recipient to achieve or maintain maximum functional capacity in performing daily activities, taking into account both the functional capacity of the recipient and the functional capacities that are appropriate of recipients of the same age.(6) "Occupational therapy" means as defined in section 3 of the act of June 15, 1982 (P.L.502, No.140), known as the "Occupational Therapy Practice Act."(7) "Physical therapy" means as defined in section 2 of the act of October 10, 1975 (P.L.383, No.110), known as the "Physical Therapy Practice Act."(8) "Speech therapy" means the therapeutic care provided to an individual for treatment administered by a licensed speech-language pathologist.Section 2. This act shall apply as follows:(1) For health insurance policies for which either rates or forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department, the addition of section 635.11 of the act shall 20250HB1848PN2284 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 apply to health insurance policies for which a form or rate is first filed on or after the effective date of this paragraph.(2) For health insurance policies for which neither rates nor forms are required to be filed with the Insurance Department, the addition of section 635.11 of the act shall apply to health insurance policies issued or renewed on or after 180 days after the effective date of this paragraph.Section 3. This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250HB1848PN2284 - 6 - 123456789